Washington statutes.
RCW 18.420.010

Definitions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1427-S2.SL) ***

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Advisory committee" means the Washington state certified peer specialist advisory committee established under *section 4 of this act.

(2) "Approved supervisor" means:

(a) Until July 1, 2028, a behavioral health provider, as defined in RCW 71.24.025 with at least two years of experience working in a behavioral health practice that employs peer specialists as part of treatment teams; or

(b) A certified peer specialist who has completed:

(i) At least 1,500 hours of work as a fully certified peer specialist engaged in the practice of peer support services, with at least 500 hours attained through the joint supervision of peers in conjunction with another approved supervisor; and

(ii) The training developed by the health care authority under RCW 71.24.920.

(3) "Certified peer specialist" means a person certified under this chapter to engage in the practice of peer support services.

(4) "Certified peer specialist trainee" means an individual working toward the supervised experience and written examination requirements to become a certified peer specialist under this chapter.

(5) "Department" means the department of health.

(6) "Practice of peer support services" means the provision of interventions by either a person in recovery from a mental health condition or substance use disorder, or both, or the parent or legal guardian of a youth who is receiving or has received behavioral health services. The client receiving the interventions receives them from a person with a similar lived experience as either a person in recovery from a mental health condition or substance use disorder, or both, or the parent or legal guardian of a youth who is receiving or has received behavioral health services. The person provides the interventions through the use of shared experiences to assist a client in the acquisition and exercise of skills needed to support the client's recovery. Interventions may include activities that assist clients in accessing or engaging in treatment and in symptom management; promote social connection, recovery, and self-advocacy; provide guidance in the development of natural community supports and basic daily living skills; and support clients in engagement, motivation, and maintenance related to achieving and maintaining health and wellness goals.

(7) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

[ 2023 c 469 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: 2023 c 469 s 4, which established the Washington state certified peer specialist advisory committee, was vetoed by the governor.